Hawaii statutes.
[PART
IV.] AINA HOOMALU STATE PARKS

[§184-31] Aina hoomalu state parks program
established; designation of aina hoomalu sites. The department shall
establish and manage a state parks interpretive program to be known as the
"aina hoomalu state parks program". The aina hoomalu state parks
program shall consist of those parks which contain unique and significant
natural or cultural history or features. The department shall designate those
state parks throughout the State which are to be included in the aina hoomalu
state parks program and shall develop interpretive programs for these parks. [L
1991, c 312, pt of §8]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next